Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Chapter 12.1. Restoration of Civil Rights.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

17 M.J. Statutes, § 27.

§ 53.1-231.1.
Process for notification regarding restoration of civil rights.

The Director of the Department of Corrections shall provide that any person convicted of a felony is notified of the loss of his civil rights and of the processes to apply for restoration of civil rights and of voting rights. The notice shall be given at the time the person has completed service of his sentence, period of probation or parole, or suspension of sentence.

The Director shall assist the Secretary of the Commonwealth in the administration of the process established by the Governor for the review of applications for restoration of civil rights.

To promote the efficient processing of applications to the Governor, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall maintain a record of the applications for restoration of rights received, the dates such applications are received, and the dates they are either granted or denied by the Governor. The Secretary shall notify each applicant who has filed a complete application that the complete application has been received and the date the complete application was forwarded by the Secretary to the Governor. Such complete application shall be forwarded by the Secretary to the Governor within ninety days after receipt of the application.

History.

2000, c. 969; 2002, c. 344.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 344, cl. 2, provides: “That the Director of the Department of Corrections shall ensure that the requirements for notification contained in §

53.1-231.1

of the Code of Virginia are performed and shall compile information on the Department’s compliance with these requirements on an annual basis by July 1 of each year.”

Acts 2002, c. 344, cl. 3, provides: “That the Supreme Court of Virginia shall ensure that there are standardized petitions for the restoration of voting rights pursuant to §

53.1-231.2

of the Code of Virginia available at all circuit court clerks’ offices.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 344 added “and of voting rights” at the end of the first sentence of the first paragraph.

Law Review.

For note, “A Jury of One’s Peers: Virginia’s Restoration of Rights Process and Its Disproportionate Effect on the African American Community,” see 46 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 2109 (2005).

§ 53.1-231.2.
Restoration of the civil right to be eligible to register to vote to certain persons.

This section shall apply to any person who is not a qualified voter because of a felony conviction, who seeks to have his right to register to vote restored and become eligible to register to vote, and who meets the conditions and requirements set out in this section.

Any person, other than a person (i) convicted of a violent felony as defined in §

19.2-297.1

or in subsection C of §

17.1-805

and any crime ancillary thereto; (ii) convicted of a felony pursuant to §

4.1-1101

,

18.2-248

,

18.2-248

.01,

18.2-248.1

,

18.2-255

,

18.2-255.2

, or

18.2-258.02

; or (iii) convicted of a felony pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, may petition the circuit court of the county or city in which he was convicted of a felony, or the circuit court of the county or city in which he presently resides, for restoration of his civil right to be eligible to register to vote through the process set out in this section. On such petition, the court may approve the petition for restoration to the person of his right if the court is satisfied from the evidence presented that the petitioner has completed, five or more years previously, service of any sentence and any modification of sentence including probation, parole, and suspension of sentence; that the petitioner has demonstrated civic responsibility through community or comparable service; and that the petitioner has been free from criminal convictions, excluding traffic infractions, for the same period.

If the court approves the petition, it shall so state in an order, provide a copy of the order to the petitioner, and transmit its order to the Secretary of the Commonwealth. The order shall state that the petitioner’s right to be eligible to register to vote may be restored by the date that is 90 days after the date of the order, subject to the approval or denial of restoration of that right by the Governor. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall transmit the order to the Governor who may grant or deny the petition for restoration of the right to be eligible to register to vote approved by the court order. The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall send, within 90 days of the date of the order, to the petitioner at the address stated on the court’s order, a certificate of restoration of that right or notice that the Governor has denied the restoration of that right. The Governor’s denial of a petition for the restoration of voting rights shall be a final decision and the petitioner shall have no right of appeal. The Secretary shall notify the court and the State Board of Elections in each case of the restoration of the right or denial of restoration by the Governor.

On receipt of the certificate of restoration of the right to register to vote from the Secretary of the Commonwealth, the petitioner, who is otherwise a qualified voter, shall become eligible to register to vote.

History.

2000, c. 969; 2003, c. 946; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 344, cl. 3, provides: “That the Supreme Court of Virginia shall ensure that there are standardized petitions for the restoration of voting rights pursuant to §

53.1-231.2

of the Code of Virginia available at all circuit court clerks’ offices.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 946 inserted “or in subsection C of §

17.1-805

” in the first sentence of the second paragraph, and twice substituted “90” for “ninety” in the third paragraph.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the second paragraph, inserted “4.1-1101” and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For note, “A Jury of One’s Peers: Virginia’s Restoration of Rights Process and Its Disproportionate Effect on the African American Community,” see 46 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 2109 (2005).

For comment, “Lifting the Fog: Ending Felony Disenfranchisement in Virginia,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 471 (2012).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-4202 Information About Petitioning a Circuit Court for Right to Register to Vote; No. 9-4203 et seq.